Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1424
License; rights of licensee.

The license provided for in sections 28-1421 and 28-1422 shall, when issued, authorize the sale of cigars, tobacco, electronic nicotine delivery systems, cigarettes, and cigarette material by the licensee and employees, to persons twenty-one years of age or over, at the place of business described in such license for the term therein authorized, unless the license is forfeited as provided in section 28-1425.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 5, p. 402;

C.S.1922, § 9853;

C.S.1929, § 28-1027;

R.S.1943, § 28-1026;

Laws 1957, c. 100, § 2, p. 359;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-1026, (1975);

Laws 2019, LB149, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB1064, § 5.